Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5741YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2058 Section 1. SUPREME COURT ââ RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE 1 REVISIONS ââ SUBPOENAS. 2 1. The supreme court shall revise rule of criminal procedure 3 2.15 to provide that any subpoena issued to a law enforcement 4 officer to compel attendance at a hearing or trial must contain 5 all of the following information: 6 a. The date and time of the arrest. 7 b. The citation number, if applicable. 8 c. The court case number, if applicable. 9 d. The name of the defendant. 10 e. The charges against the defendant. 11 f. The date, time, and location of trial. 12 2. A law enforcement officer shall be given a minimum of 13 thirty daysâ notice before trial. 14 3. The revised rules of criminal procedure shall be 15 submitted for legislative council review no later than October 16 14, 2026. 17